Maryland, session 2026, HB1393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
12–104.
(a) In addition to the specific powers granted and duties imposed by this title, the
Administration has the powers and duties set forth in this section.
(b) The Administration may adopt rules and regulations to carry out:
(1) Those provisions of the Maryland Vehicle Law that relate to or are
administered and enforced by the Administration; and
(2) The provisions of any other law that the Administration is authorized
to administer and enforce.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1393*

HOUSE BILL 1393
(c) (1) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ESTABLISH A VIRTUAL
QUEUING SYSTEM FOR TELEPHONE CALLERS WAITING TO SPEAK TO A LIVE
REPRESENTATIVE AT THE ADMINISTRATION.
(II) THE VIRTUAL QUEUING SYSTEM SHALL ALLOW A
TELEPHONE CALLER TO REQUEST A RETURN CALL INSTEAD OF REMAINING ON HOLD
WHILE RETAINING THE TELEPHONE CALLER’S ORIGINAL POSITION IN THE
TELEPHONE QUEUE.
(2) The Administration shall maintain as many offices in this State as the
Administrator considers necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the
Administration.
[(2)] (3) Each office shall be open on the days and during the hours that
the Secretary determines are needed to serve the public.
(d) (1) With the approval of the Secretary, the Administration shall employ
the deputies, subordinate officers, clerks, investigators, and other employees necessary to
carry out the powers and duties of the Administration.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, and subject to § 2–103.4 of this
article, each deputy, officer, and employee of the Administration:
(i) Is in the State Personnel Management System; and
(ii) Is entitled to the salary provided in the pay plan established
under Title 8, Subtitle 1 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
(e) The Administration may delegate to the Office of Administrative Hearings the
power and authority under the Maryland Vehicle Law to conduct hearings under this
article and render final decisions in hearings conducted under this article.
(f) In accordance with § 6–313 of the Courts Article and the Maryland Rules, the
Administration shall serve as the agent to receive a subpoena, a summons, or other process
for a nonresident driver named as a party in an action brought in a court of this State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.